Utah statutes.
63C-12-104.   Advisory council duties -- Meetings.
(1)  The council shall:
(a)  meet at least annually but may also meet at the call of:
(i)  the chair; or
(ii)  at least two council members;
(b)  provide advice to the research team, including recommendations concerning
the type of data and information gathered by the research team;
(c)  review the data and information gathered and reported by the research
team, including baseline data and changes from baseline data; and
(d)  act as liaison between the research team and the persons represented by
the council.
(2)  A majority of the council members constitute a quorum for the transaction
of council business.
(3)  The council may advise the governor and the Legislature on any issue
relating to its review under Subsection (1)(c).
